url.lexc
! Copyright 2011-2015 Cagri Coltekin <c.coltekin@rug.nl> 
!
! Released under the terms of the MIT License
! Copyright (c) 2011-2015 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! 
! Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a
! copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"),
! to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation
! the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense,
! and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
! Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
! 
! The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
! all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
! 
! THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
! IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
! FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
! AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
! LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
! FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER
! DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
!

! This file defines an FSA (using lexc) that captures URLs and
! email addresses. It provides a best effort match.
! False alarms and misses are expected.
!
! The following (and probably more) are currently not recognized 
!   - 'username:password' in URLs (http://user:pass@example.com)
!   - URLs with IPv6 addresses (http://[::1]/
!   - TLD matching is approximate (any string between 2 and 10 characters).
!     Maximum prevents some long TLDS (e.g., .international) not
!     recognized. Using a list of TLD names would be more accurate,
!     but makes foma choke during minimization (over 12G of memory 
!     usage), and produces a relatively large automata
!   - Host names without a scheme is recognized only for a limited number 
!     of TLDs (otherwise we match when people leave out space after a 
!     sentence final dot, which seems to be a common typographical error.
!   - 'mailto:' URLs are marked as 'Email'.
!

LEXICON Root
                Email;
                URL;

LEXICON Email
<[A|B|C|Ç|D|E|F|G|Ğ|H|I|İ|J|K|L|M|N|O|Ö|P|R|S|Ş|T|U|Ü|V|Y|Z|Î|Û|Â|
  a|b|c|ç|d|e|f|g|ğ|h|i|ı|j|k|l|m|n|o|ö|p|r|s|ş|t|u|ü|v|y|z|î|û|â|
  %.|%_|%+|%-]+%@> EmailHostName;

LEXICON EmailHostName
<[[A|B|C|Ç|D|E|F|G|Ğ|H|I|İ|J|K|L|M|N|O|Ö|P|R|S|Ş|T|U|Ü|V|Y|Z|Î|Û|Â|
   a|b|c|ç|d|e|f|g|ğ|h|i|ı|j|k|l|m|n|o|ö|p|r|s|ş|t|u|ü|v|y|z|î|û|â|
   %-]^{1,63}%.]+> EmailTLD;
localhost           EmailEnd;

LEXICON EmailTLD
<[A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|R|S|T|U|
  a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|r|s|t|u]^{2,10}>     EmailEnd;

LEXICON EmailEnd
%<Email%>:@RB             #;
%<Email%>:@RB@APOS        Ncont;

LEXICON URL
http%://                URLHostName;
ftp%://                 URLHostName;
https%://               URLHostName;
mailto%:                Email;
www%.                   URLHostName;
ftp%.                   URLHostName;
                        BareHostName;

LEXICON BareHostName                        
<[[A|B|C|Ç|D|E|F|G|Ğ|H|I|İ|J|K|L|M|N|O|Ö|P|R|S|Ş|T|U|Ü|V|Y|Z|Î|Û|Â|X|Q|W|
   a|b|c|ç|d|e|f|g|ğ|h|i|ı|j|k|l|m|n|o|ö|p|r|s|ş|t|u|ü|v|y|z|î|û|â|x|q|w|
   %-]^{1,63}%.]+>      UrlTLDList;

LEXICON URLHostName
<[[A|B|C|Ç|D|E|F|G|Ğ|H|I|İ|J|K|L|M|N|O|Ö|P|R|S|Ş|T|U|Ü|V|Y|Z|Î|Û|Â|X|Q|W|
   a|b|c|ç|d|e|f|g|ğ|h|i|ı|j|k|l|m|n|o|ö|p|r|s|ş|t|u|ü|v|y|z|î|û|â|x|q|w|
   %-]^{1,63}%.]+>                      UrlTLD;
<[[[%0|1|2]
   [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]^2]|
  [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]^{1,2}]
 [%.[[[%0|1|2]
      [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]^2]|
     [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]^{1,2}]]^3>  URLPort;
localhost                               URLPort;


LEXICON UrlTLD
<[A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|R|S|T|U|X|Q|W|
  a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|r|s|t|u|x|q|w]^{2,10}>     URLPort;

LEXICON URLPort
<%:[%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]^{1,5}>        URLPath;
                                        URLPath;

LEXICON URLPath
<%/[[A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|R|S|T|U|X|Q|W|
   a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|r|s|t|u|x|q|w|
   0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|
   %/|%.|%-|%_|%~|%$|%?|%&|%%|%'|%#|%(|%)|%*|%+|
   %,|%;|%=|%:|%@|%!]^{1,63}]+>                             URLEnd;

LEXICON UrlTLDList
com             URLPort;  
org             URLPort; 
net             URLPort; 
edu             URLPort; 
info            URLPort;  
biz             URLPort; 
ac              URLPort;
ad              URLPort;
ae              URLPort;
af              URLPort;
ag              URLPort;
ai              URLPort;
al              URLPort;
am              URLPort;
an              URLPort;
ao              URLPort;
aq              URLPort;
ar              URLPort;
as              URLPort;
at              URLPort;
au              URLPort;
aw              URLPort;
ax              URLPort;
az              URLPort;
ba              URLPort;
bb              URLPort;
bd              URLPort;
be              URLPort;
bf              URLPort;
bg              URLPort;
bh              URLPort;
bi              URLPort;
bj              URLPort;
bm              URLPort;
bn              URLPort;
bo              URLPort;
br              URLPort;
bs              URLPort;
bt              URLPort;
bv              URLPort;
bw              URLPort;
by              URLPort;
bz              URLPort;
ca              URLPort;
cc              URLPort;
cd              URLPort;
cf              URLPort;
cg              URLPort;
ch              URLPort;
ci              URLPort;
ck              URLPort;
cl              URLPort;
cm              URLPort;
cn              URLPort;
co              URLPort;
cr              URLPort;
cs              URLPort;
cu              URLPort;
cv              URLPort;
cx              URLPort;
cy              URLPort;
cz              URLPort;
dd              URLPort;
de              URLPort;
dj              URLPort;
dk              URLPort;
dm              URLPort;
do              URLPort;
dz              URLPort;
ec              URLPort;
ee              URLPort;
eg              URLPort;
eh              URLPort;
er              URLPort;
es              URLPort;
et              URLPort;
eu              URLPort;
fi              URLPort;
fj              URLPort;
fk              URLPort;
fm              URLPort;
fo              URLPort;
fr              URLPort;
ga              URLPort;
gb              URLPort;
gd              URLPort;
ge              URLPort;
gf              URLPort;
gg              URLPort;
gh              URLPort;
gi              URLPort;
gl              URLPort;
gm              URLPort;
gn              URLPort;
gp              URLPort;
gq              URLPort;
gr              URLPort;
gs              URLPort;
gt              URLPort;
gu              URLPort;
gw              URLPort;
gy              URLPort;
hk              URLPort;
hm              URLPort;
hn              URLPort;
hr              URLPort;
ht              URLPort;
hu              URLPort;
id              URLPort;
ie              URLPort;
il              URLPort;
im              URLPort;
in              URLPort;
io              URLPort;
iq              URLPort;
ir              URLPort;
is              URLPort;
it              URLPort;
je              URLPort;
jm              URLPort;
jo              URLPort;
jp              URLPort;
ke              URLPort;
kg              URLPort;
kh              URLPort;
ki              URLPort;
km              URLPort;
kn              URLPort;
kp              URLPort;
kr              URLPort;
kw              URLPort;
ky              URLPort;
kz              URLPort;
la              URLPort;
lb              URLPort;
lc              URLPort;
li              URLPort;
lk              URLPort;
lr              URLPort;
ls              URLPort;
lt              URLPort;
lu              URLPort;
lv              URLPort;
ly              URLPort;
ma              URLPort;
mc              URLPort;
md              URLPort;
me              URLPort;
mg              URLPort;
mh              URLPort;
mk              URLPort;
ml              URLPort;
mm              URLPort;
mn              URLPort;
mo              URLPort;
mp              URLPort;
mq              URLPort;
mr              URLPort;
ms              URLPort;
mt              URLPort;
mu              URLPort;
mv              URLPort;
mw              URLPort;
mx              URLPort;
my              URLPort;
mz              URLPort;
na              URLPort;
nc              URLPort;
ne              URLPort;
nf              URLPort;
ng              URLPort;
ni              URLPort;
nl              URLPort;
no              URLPort;
np              URLPort;
nr              URLPort;
nu              URLPort;
nz              URLPort;
om              URLPort;
pa              URLPort;
pe              URLPort;
pf              URLPort;
pg              URLPort;
ph              URLPort;
pk              URLPort;
pl              URLPort;
pm              URLPort;
pn              URLPort;
pr              URLPort;
ps              URLPort;
pt              URLPort;
pw              URLPort;
py              URLPort;
qa              URLPort;
re              URLPort;
ro              URLPort;
rs              URLPort;
ru              URLPort;
rw              URLPort;
sa              URLPort;
sb              URLPort;
sc              URLPort;
sd              URLPort;
se              URLPort;
sg              URLPort;
sh              URLPort;
si              URLPort;
sj              URLPort;
sk              URLPort;
sl              URLPort;
sm              URLPort;
sn              URLPort;
so              URLPort;
sr              URLPort;
st              URLPort;
su              URLPort;
sv              URLPort;
sy              URLPort;
sz              URLPort;
tc              URLPort;
td              URLPort;
tf              URLPort;
tg              URLPort;
th              URLPort;
tj              URLPort;
tk              URLPort;
tl              URLPort;
tm              URLPort;
tn              URLPort;
to              URLPort;
tp              URLPort;
tr              URLPort;
tt              URLPort;
tv              URLPort;
tw              URLPort;
tz              URLPort;
ua              URLPort;
ug              URLPort;
uk              URLPort;
um              URLPort;
us              URLPort;
uy              URLPort;
uz              URLPort;
va              URLPort;
vc              URLPort;
ve              URLPort;
vg              URLPort;
vi              URLPort;
vn              URLPort;
vu              URLPort;
wf              URLPort;
ws              URLPort;
ye              URLPort;
yt              URLPort;
yu              URLPort;
za              URLPort;
zm              URLPort;
zr              URLPort;
zw              URLPort;
